California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(e) A taxpayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) may be required to enter into any collateral agreement that is deemed necessary for the protection of the interests of the state. A collateral agreement may include a provision that allows the department to reestablish the liability, or any portion thereof, if the taxpayer has sufficient annual income during the succeeding five-year period. The department shall establish criteria for determining “sufficient annual income” for purposes of this subdivision.

(f) A taxpayer that has received a compromise under paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall file and pay by the due date all subsequently required use fuel tax returns for a five-year period from the date the liability is compromised, or until the taxpayer is no longer required to file use fuel tax returns, whichever period is earlier.

(g) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that
 would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(h) A determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(i) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the taxpayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the taxpayer.

(j) When more than one taxpayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable taxpayer shall not relieve the other taxpayers from paying the entire liability. However, the amount of the liability shall be reduced by the amount of the accepted offer.

(k) Whenever a compromise of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax and related
 penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 9255. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(l) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished (without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable), and no
 portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(m) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this
 section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(n) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, a member of the taxpayer’s
 family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(o) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 25.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 26 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 474.)
-------------------------------------------

9278.

(a) The director of the department, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), or related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) Offers in compromise shall be considered only for liabilities that were generated from a business that has been discontinued or transferred, where the taxpayer making the offer no longer has a controlling interest or association with the transferred business or has a controlling interest or association with a similar type of business as the transferred or discontinued
 business.

(d) For amounts to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that:

(A) The amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income.

(B) The taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The department shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

(e) A
 determination by the department that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(f) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the department shall notify the taxpayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the taxpayer.

(g) When more than one taxpayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other business combinations, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable taxpayer shall not relieve the other taxpayers from paying the entire liability. However, the amount of the liability shall be reduced by the amount of the
 accepted offer.

(h) Whenever a compromise of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the director of the department a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information
 that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 9255. No list shall be prepared and no releases distributed by the department in connection with these statements.

(i) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished (without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable), and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The department determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the department property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or
 other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(j) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(k) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, a member of the taxpayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(l) This section shall become operative on January 1,
 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 26.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Section operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Distribution of Proceeds [9301. - 9304.]

9301.

The board shall transmit all money received by it under this part, except the amounts of overpayments of the fees required by Section 8707 and 8714 of this part, to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund. The board shall at the same time furnish copies of the schedules covering the transmittals to the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

All money deposited in the fund under this part is hereby appropriated as follows:

(a) To pay the refunds authorized in this part.

(b) To the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund as provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

The Controller shall transfer the balance of all money deposited in the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund under this part, after the payment of refunds, to the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 544.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

The Controller shall make the transfers at the same time as the transfers to the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund of moneys received under the Motor Vehicle Fuel Tax Law are made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Violations [9351. - 9355.]

9351.

Any person who places or causes to be placed fuel into a receptacle on a motor vehicle from which receptacle fuel is supplied for the propulsion of the vehicle, or who acquires fuel outside this state and uses the fuel for the propulsion of a motor vehicle within this state, is guilty of a misdemeanor unless that person is a vendor and collects the tax as provided under Section 8732 or 8736 or that person is a user who holds a valid use fuel tax permit, or is excluded from that requirement under Section 8608, and uses the fuel placed in the receptacle. He or
 she shall be fined for each offense not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or be imprisoned for not exceeding six months in the county jail, or be subject to both fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 16.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

9352.

Any person who fails or refuses to file any return required to be made, or who fails or refuses to furnish a supplemental return or other data required by the board is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 370.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

9353.

Any person required to make, render, sign, or verify any return who makes any false or fraudulent return with intent to defeat or evade the determination required by law to be made is guilty of a misdemeanor. He shall for each offense be fined not less than three hundred dollars ($300) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or be imprisoned for not exceeding one year in the county jail, or be subject to both fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 556.)
-------------------------------------------

9354.

Any violation of the provisions of this part, except as otherwise provided, is a misdemeanor and is punishable as such.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

9354.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, any person who violates this part with intent to defeat or evade the determination of an amount due required by law to be made is guilty of a felony when the amount of tax liability aggregates twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more in any 12-consecutive-month period. The determination shall be approved by the executive director or his or her designee. Each offense shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or
 imprisonment for 16 months, two years, or three years, or by both the fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9355.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense, or within two years after the violation is discovered, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1361, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3.5. FUEL TAX AGREEMENTS [9401. - 9433.]



  CHAPTER 1. Fuel Tax Agreements [9401. - 9401.]

9401.

The board, with the approval of the Department of Finance, may on behalf of the state become a party to a reciprocal fuel tax agreement between this state and another jurisdiction, or an agency thereof that is authorized to enter into an agreement, providing for the administration, collection, and enforcement by a party to the agreement of the taxes imposed upon motor fuels by another jurisdiction, and for the forwarding of collections to the jurisdiction on behalf of which the tax was collected.

For purposes of this
 section, “taxes imposed upon motor fuels” means the taxes imposed by this state pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601) or Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001), and taxes of a similar nature imposed upon any motor fuels by another jurisdiction under its laws.

For purposes of this section, a “jurisdiction” is this state, any other state, the District of Columbia, a province or territory of Canada, or any governmental entity, which is a party to a reciprocal fuel tax agreement authorized by this section.

The board may adopt and enforce regulations necessary to implement the terms of a reciprocal fuel tax agreement to which the board is a party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The International Fuel Tax Agreement [9405. - 9433.]



  ARTICLE 1. Construction [9405. - 9407.]

9405.

This chapter shall be administered in conjunction with the IFTA, the Use Fuel Tax Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601)), and the Diesel Fuel Tax Law (Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001)). Whenever the Use Fuel Tax Law or the Diesel Fuel Tax Law is inconsistent with the IFTA or this chapter, the IFTA or this chapter shall prevail except where prohibited by the California Constitution or United States Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 4.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

9407.

(a) The IFTA, for the purposes of this chapter, may be used to:

(1) Determine the base state jurisdiction for motor carriers engaged in interstate commerce.

(2) Impose recordkeeping requirements.

(3) Specify audit procedures.

(4) Establish procedures for
 the exchange of information.

(5) Identify interstate motor carriers.

(6) Define motor vehicles and fuels subject to the provisions of the agreement.

(7) Determine bond requirements.

(8) Specify reporting requirements, due dates of returns, interest and penalty rates, and provisions for failure to file returns.

(9) Specify methods for collection of taxes, interest, and penalties.

(10) Determine methods for the distribution of taxes and interest collected or assessed to the appropriate jurisdictions.

(11) Deny, suspend, or cancel benefits under the agreement to
 any interstate motor carrier who violates the provisions of the agreement.

(b) The board may adopt regulations to administer the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 5.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [9410. - 9411.]

9410.

“Contractor” includes a subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9411.

“IFTA” means the International Fuel Tax Agreement. The International Fuel Tax Agreement consists of the Articles of Agreement, the Procedures Manual, the Audit Manual, as amended from time to time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 6.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Annual Fees [9420. - 9420.]

9420.

Except for trip permits as provided in Sections 8708 and 60122, all interstate users who choose to obtain an IFTA license from the board shall apply for a license and secure decals for their vehicles. Application for the license and decals shall be made annually on forms prescribed by the board. The application shall be under oath and shall contain that information as the board deems necessary. Upon receipt of the application, and upon payment of any required reinstatement fee, the board may issue to the applicant a license and
 decals.

The decals issued to the interstate user shall be placed on both exterior sides of the vehicle cab. Failure to display the decals in the required location may subject the interstate user to the purchase of a trip permit. The transfer of decals from one interstate user to another interstate user is prohibited. All decals shall remain the property of the state and may be recalled for any violation of the provisions of the IFTA.

A fee to be determined by the board shall be charged for the annual license and a set of two decals issued prior to and during the calendar year that the license and decal is valid. The board may also prescribe procedures and set a fee for the issuance of a 30-day IFTA temporary license or replacement decals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 7.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [9425. - 9425.]

9425.

The exemptions in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8651) of Part 3 do not apply to IFTA-required returns. However, the exempt use shall be refunded under the refund provisions in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 9151) of Part 3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. IFTA Disclosure [9430. - 9430.]

9430.

(a) The board shall make available any and all information obtained under this chapter to any member jurisdiction of the IFTA, a designee of the member jurisdiction, or any contractor under contract with the board. The information obtained by the member jurisdiction, designee, or contractor shall not be made public except to the extent authorized by the agreement.

(b) The member jurisdictions of the IFTA and the board may utilize any information obtained pursuant to this
 chapter to develop data on international or interstate commerce, fuel consumption, and any aspect of motor fuel tax administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Distribution of Proceeds [9432. - 9433.]

9432.

The board shall transmit all moneys received by it under this chapter to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury. The board in accordance with the Treasurer shall set up a reserve account in the State Treasury to disburse those moneys as needed. After distribution payments to other jurisdictions and refunds authorized by the IFTA, the balance remaining in the reserve account shall be transferred, except as provided in Section 9433, to the Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 8.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

9433.

The fees paid for licenses and decals issued under Section 9420 shall be deposited in a reserve account in the State Treasury and shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used for administration of the IFTA program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. LOCAL MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAXATION [9501. - 9507.]

9501.

(a) Except as specified in subdivision (c), in addition to taxes imposed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 99500) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301), Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), and Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001) of this division, on motor vehicle fuel, a tax may be imposed by a county on a countywide basis in accordance with this part.

(b) The tax shall be imposed in increments of one
 cent ($0.01) per gallon or, in the case of compressed natural gas, one cent ($0.01) per 100 cubic feet as measured at standard pressure and temperature.

(c) No tax shall be imposed under this part on fuel used in propelling an aircraft or a vessel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

(a) Prior to imposition and collection of any tax under this part, a proposition granting authority to the county to impose the tax shall be submitted to and approved by the voters at an election. The proposition shall specify the maximum tax to be imposed and may specify the period for which the tax will be imposed.

(b) A proposition may be submitted to the voters under subdivision (a) only if (1) it is approved by the board of supervisors and a majority of the city councils of the cities having a majority of the population in the incorporated
 areas of the county, as provided in subdivision (c), and (2) the county and the majority of the cities having a majority of the population in the incorporated areas of the county have a written agreement with respect to allocation of the revenues between the county and the cities.

(c) If the board of supervisors approves the proposition prior to the approval of a majority of the city councils of the cities having a majority of the population in the incorporated area of the county, the approval of the other city councils to secure both of those majorities shall be secured within one year of the approval of the board of supervisors. If the board of supervisors approves the proposition after the approval of the city councils with both of those majorities, the approval of the board of supervisors shall be made within one year of the date of the approval of the city council which results in the proposition being approved by the city councils with
 both of those majorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1085, Sec. 2.   Effective September 16, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.5.

If the countywide tax is imposed within the County of Los Angeles, the portion of the proceeds of the tax allocated and spent within the boundaries of the San Fernando Valley Statistical Area, as defined in Section 11093 of the Government Code, shall be not less, on a percentage basis, than the percent that the population of the San Fernando Valley Statistical Area is of the total population of Los Angeles County.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 790, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

(a) The county shall contract with the State Board of Equalization for the administration of any tax imposed under this part, and the state board shall be reimbursed for its cost in the administration of the tax.

(b) The county shall also reimburse the state board for its cost of preparation to administer the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

9504.

The State Board of Equalization shall adopt the necessary rules and regulations to administer the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

9505.

After deducting its cost in administering the tax, the State Board of Equalization shall transmit the net revenues to the county periodically as promptly as possible for distribution in accordance with the allocation agreement between the county and cities. The transmittals from the Board of Equalization to counties and the transmittal from counties to cities shall be made at least twice in each calendar quarter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1589, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

9506.

The ordinance shall include provisions identical to those contained in Part 2 (commencing with Section 7301), Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601), and Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001), except that the name of the county as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

9507.

The net revenues received by counties and cities from taxes imposed under this part shall be expended only for the purposes authorized by Article XIX of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 541, Sec. 14.   Effective September 17, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. VEHICLE LICENSE FEE [10701. - 11053.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [10701. - 10706.]

10701.

This part is known and may be cited as the “Vehicle License Fee Law.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

10702.

“Vehicle” means every vehicle subject to registration under the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

10703.

“Department” means the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

10704.

“Horseless carriage” means any vehicle within the provisions of Section 5004 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1437.)
-------------------------------------------

10705.

“Registration year” is the period of time beginning with the date the vehicle is first required to be registered in this state under the provisions of the Vehicle Code and ending on the date designated by the Director of Motor Vehicles for expiration of the registration or the period of time designated for subsequent renewal thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

10706.

“Year-round registration” is a system whereby the Director of Motor Vehicles designates a date for the expiration of registration of a vehicle and renewal thereof in order to equalize the volume of such renewals throughout the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Imposition of Fee [10751. - 10789.]



  ARTICLE 1. Computation of Fee [10751. - 10760.]

10751.

A license fee is hereby imposed for the privilege of operating upon the public highways in this state any vehicle of a type which is subject to registration under the Vehicle Code, or any trailer coach which is required to be moved under permit as authorized in Section 35790 of the Vehicle Code and which is not subject to local property taxation pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 5800) of Division 1. Vehicles of banks, including national banking associations, shall be subject to all provisions of the Vehicle Code to the same extent and same manner as other vehicles, and shall be subject to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1149, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.

(a) The annual amount of the license fee for any vehicle, other than a trailer or semitrailer, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 5014.1 of the Vehicle Code or a commercial motor vehicle described in Section 9400.1 of the Vehicle Code, or a trailer coach that is required to be moved under permit as authorized in Section 35790 of the Vehicle Code, shall be a sum equal to the following percentage
 of the market value of the vehicle as determined by the department:

(1) Sixty-five hundredths of 1 percent on and after January 1, 2005, and before May 19, 2009.

(2) One percent for initial and renewal registrations due on and after May 19, 2009, but before July 1, 2011.

(3) Sixty-five hundredths of 1 percent for initial and renewal registrations due on and after July 1, 2011.

(b) The annual amount of the license fee for any commercial vehicle as described in Section 9400.1 of the Vehicle Code, shall be a sum equal to 0.65 percent of the market value of the vehicle as determined by the department.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11001) or any other law to the
 contrary, all revenues (including penalties), less refunds, attributable to that portion of the rate imposed pursuant to this section in excess of 0.65 percent shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex., Ch. 18, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 35, Sec. 2.   (SB 89)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.1.

(a) The annual amount of the license fee for a trailer coach which is required to be moved under permit as authorized in Section 35790 of the Vehicle Code shall be a sum equal to the following percentage of the market value of the vehicle as determined by the department:

(1) Sixty-five hundredths of 1 percent on and after January 1,
 2005, and before May 19, 2009.

(2) One percent for initial and renewal registrations due on and after May 19, 2009, but before July 1, 2011.

(3) Sixty-five hundredths of 1 percent for initial and renewal registrations due on and after July 1, 2011.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11001) or any other law to the contrary, all revenues (including penalties), less refunds, attributable to that portion of the rate imposed pursuant to this section in excess of 0.65 percent shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex., Ch. 18, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 35, Sec. 4.   (SB 89)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.2.

(a) For initial or renewal registrations due on and after May 19, 2009, but before July 1, 2011, in addition to the annual license fee for a vehicle, other than a commercial motor vehicle described in Section 9400.1 of the Vehicle Code, imposed pursuant to Sections 10752 and 10752.1, a sum equal to 0.15 percent of the market value of the vehicle as determined by the department, shall be added to
 that annual fee.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11001) or any other law to the contrary, all revenues (including penalties), less refunds, derived from fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the General Fund and transferred to the Local Safety and Protection Account, which is hereby established in the Transportation Tax Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the account are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the Controller for allocation pursuant to Sections 29553, 30061, and 30070 of the Government Code, Section 13821 of the Penal Code, and Sections 18220 and 18220.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. All revenue derived from subdivision (a) that is received after June 30, 2011, shall be deemed to have been received during the 2010–11 fiscal year for purposes of allocation by the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 168.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.5.

(a) The additional revenue resulting from the amendments made to Sections 10752 and 10752.1, and the addition of Section 17052.2, by Chapter 18 of the Statutes of 2009, Third Extraordinary Session, is not revenue derived from taxes imposed pursuant to this part that is subject to subdivision (a) of Section 15 of Article XI of the California Constitution, for purposes of a
 local ordinance that governs the expenditure of funds received by Nevada County from the taxes imposed pursuant to this part.

(b) This section shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2011, unless the Director of Finance makes the notification pursuant to Section 99040 of the Government Code, in which case this section shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 605, Sec. 1.   (SB 636)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Inoperative on July 1, 2011, or July 1, 2013, as provided in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

10752.7.

Designated vehicle license fee revenues shall not, for purposes of an ordinance of the County of Nevada that requires that any revenues derived under this part be expended for any specified purpose, be deemed vehicle license fee revenues as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 15 of Article XI of the California Constitution or this part. For purposes of this section, “designated vehicle license fee revenues” means vehicle license revenues that are collected under this part and are
 required by this part to be deposited into the Local Law Enforcement Services Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 735, Sec. 1.   (AB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.

(a) Upon the first sale of a new vehicle to a consumer and upon each sale of a used vehicle to a consumer, the department shall determine the market value of the vehicle on the basis of the cost price to the purchaser as evidenced by a certificate of cost, but not including California sales or use tax or any local sales, transactions, use, or other local tax. “Cost price” includes the value of any modifications made by the seller.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the
 department shall not redetermine the market value of used vehicles, or modify the vehicle license fee classification of used vehicles determined pursuant to Section 10753.2, when the seller is the parent, grandparent, child, grandchild, or spouse of the purchaser, and the seller is not engaged in the business of selling vehicles subject to registration under the Vehicle Code, or when a lessor, as defined in Section 372 of the Vehicle Code, transfers title and registration of a vehicle to the lessee at the expiration or termination of a lease.

(c) (1) In the event that any commercial vehicle is modified or additions are made to the chassis or body at a cost of two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more, but not including any change of engine of the same type or any cost of repairs to a commercial vehicle, the owner of the commercial vehicle shall report any modification or addition to the department and the department shall
 classify or reclassify the commercial vehicle in its proper class as provided in Section 10753.2, taking into consideration the increase in the market value of the commercial vehicle due to those modifications or additions, and any reclassification resulting in an increase in market value shall be based on the cost to the consumer of those modifications or additions. In the event any vehicle is modified or altered resulting in a decrease in the market value thereof of two hundred dollars ($200) or more as reported to and determined by the department, the department shall classify or reclassify the vehicle in its proper class as provided in Section 10753.2.

(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply under any of the following conditions:

(A) When the cost of any modification or addition to the chassis or body of a commercial vehicle is less than two thousand dollars ($2,000).
